Missouri, session 2026, HB2376.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 574, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 574.136, to read as follows:
574.136. 1. A person commits the offense of solicitation on an interstate highway
or in a public right-of-way if he or she intentionally solicits, begs, panhandles, or
otherwise requests anything of value on any interstate highway, public right-of-way, or
entrance or exit ramp of an interstate highway.
2. The offense of solicitation on an interstate highway or in a public right-of-way
is a class B misdemeanor.
3. As used in this section the term "anything of value" means cash, currency,
coin, or any other financial instrument given to a person.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any organization authorized to
solicit for a charitable contribution under section 67.304.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.